Wisconsin, session 2025, AB519.
do enact as follows:AB519,11Section 1. 767.407 (1) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:AB519,2,52767.407 (1) (bm) The court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for a minor child 3in any action affecting the family where a petition has been filed for reasonable 4visitation rights under s. 767.43 and the petitioner has established standing to file 5the petition.AB519,26Section 2. Initial applicability.AB519,2,87(1) This act first applies to a petition filed for reasonable visitation rights 8under s. 767.43 on the effective date of this subsection.AB519,2,99